Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated  to the Office of the Governor, for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $16,403,726.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Office of the Governor, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of  $50,000 for the necessary expenses of the Governor in connection
with the duties  imposed by law and for such other expenses as may be incumbent upon or
requested by the Governor.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,962,796 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Office of the Governor for the Regional Solutions Program.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$3,924,437 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Office of the
Governor.
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled House Bill 5021 (HB 5021-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 20, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5021 (HB 5021-A) Page 2